Hawaii statutes.
§281-41 Transfer of licenses; notice of
change in officers, directors, and stockholders of corporate licenses, partners
of a partnership license, and members of a limited liability company license;
penalty. (a) No license issued under this chapter to an original
applicant or to any transferee shall be transferable or be transferred within
one year of the issuance or transfer, except for good cause shown to the
satisfaction of the liquor commission. A transfer of license shall be for the
same class, kind, and category of license. No license issued under this
chapter shall be transferable or be transferred except upon written application
to the commission by the proposed transferee, and after prior inspection of the
premises, reference to, and report by an inspector, and a public hearing held
by the commission not less than fourteen days after one publication of notice
thereof, but without sending notice of the hearing by mail to persons being the
owners or lessees of real estate situated within the vicinity of the premises
and without the right to the owners or lessees to protest the transfer of a
license. Exceptions are class 5 and 11 licensees who must comply with the
requirements as set forth in sections 281-57 to 281-60.

(b) A county may increase the requirements for
transfers of class 5, category (1)(B) and (D), and class 11 licenses by
ordinance designating one or more areas within the county as special liquor
districts and specifying the requirements applicable to transfers of any of
these licenses within each district.

(c) For the purpose of this section,
"special liquor district" means an area designated by a county for
restoration, reservation, historic preservation, redevelopment, rejuvenation,
or residential protection, in which development is guided to protect or enhance
the physical and visual aspects of the area for the benefit of the community as
a whole.

(d) Where a license is held by a partnership,
the commission may, notwithstanding this section, approve the transfer of the
partnership interest upon the death or withdrawal of a member of the
partnership to any remaining partner or partners without publication of notice
at a public hearing.

(e) Where a license is held by a partnership,
limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or a limited liability
company, the admission or withdrawal of a limited partner, partner of a limited
liability partnership, or a member of the limited liability company shall not
be deemed a transfer of the license held by the partnership or limited
liability company, but the licensee shall, prior to such admission or
withdrawal, so notify the commission in writing, stating the name of the
partner, partners, member, or members who have withdrawn, if such be the case,
and the name, age, and place of residence of the partner, partners, member, or
members who have been admitted, if that be the case. If the commission finds a
partner or a member to be an unfit or improper person to hold a license in the
partner's or member's own right pursuant to section 281-45, it may revoke the
license or suspend the license of the partnership or the limited liability
company until the unfit or improper partner or member is removed or replaced.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the same procedure shall be followed in regard to the transfer of a
license as is prescribed by this chapter for obtaining a license. Sections
281-51 to 281-60, except where inconsistent with any provision hereof, are
hereby made applicable to such transfers. The word "applicant", as
used in such sections, shall include each such proposed transferee, and the
words, "application for a license or for the renewal of a license",
as used in such sections, shall include an application for the transfer of a
license.

(g) Upon the hearing, the commission shall
consider the application and any objections to the granting thereof and hear
the parties in interest. It shall inquire into the propriety of each transfer
and determine whether the proposed transferee is a fit person to hold the license.
It may approve a transfer or refuse to approve a transfer and the refusal by
the commission to approve a transfer shall be final and conclusive, unless an
appeal is taken as provided in chapter 91.

(h) If any licensee without such approval transfers
to any other person the licensee's business for which the licensee's license
was issued, either openly or under any undisclosed arrangement, whereby any
person, other than the licensee, comes into possession or control of the
business or takes in any partner or associate, the commission may in its
discretion suspend or cancel the license.

(i) If the licensee is a corporation, a change
in ownership of any outstanding capital stock shall not be deemed a transfer of
a license; provided that in the case of a change in ownership of twenty-five
per cent or more of the stock or in the case of change in ownership of any
number of shares of the stock that results in the transferee thereof becoming
the owner of twenty-five per cent or more of the outstanding voting capital
stock, the corporate licensee shall, prior to the date of the transfer, apply
for and secure the approval of the transfer from the commission in writing. If
the commission finds that the proposed transferee is an unfit or improper
person to hold a license in the proposed transferee's own right pursuant to
section 281-45, it shall not approve the proposed transfer. If any transfer is
made without the prior approval of the commission, the commission may in its
discretion revoke or suspend the license until it determines that the
transferee is a fit and proper person, and if the commission finds that the
transferee is not a fit and proper person, until a retransfer or new transfer
of the capital stock is made to a fit and proper person pursuant to section
281-45. In addition, the corporate licensee shall, within thirty days from the
date of election of any officer or director, notify the commission in writing
of the name, age, and place of residence of the officer or director; provided
that if the licensee is a publicly-traded company, or an entity ultimately
solely owned by a publicly-traded company, the licensee shall, within thirty
days from the date of election of any replacement of an officer designated as a
primary decisionmaker regarding the purchase and sale of liquor, notify the
commission in writing of the name, age, and place of residence of the
officers. If the commission finds the transferee, officer, or director an
unfit or improper person to hold a license in the transferee's, officer's, or
director's own right pursuant to section 281-45, it may in its discretion
revoke the license or suspend the license until a retransfer or new transfer of
the capital stock is effected to a fit or proper person pursuant to section
281-45 or until the unfit or improper transferee, officer, or director is
removed or replaced by a fit and proper person pursuant to section 281-45.

(j) If a licensee closes out the business for
which the license is held, during the term for which the license was issued,
the licensee shall, within five days from the date of closing the same, give
the commission written notice thereof and surrender the licensee's license for
cancellation.

(k) The conversion of an entity into any other
form of entity or the merger of any entity with any other entity shall not be
deemed a transfer of the license; provided that the licensee, prior to the date
of the conversion or merger, shall apply for and secure the approval of the
commission without any requirement for publication of notice. The foregoing
shall not preclude compliance with subsection (d) upon a change in any of the
partners or members, or with subsection (i) upon change of any shareholders,
officers, or directors of any entity occurring concurrently with a conversion or
merger.

As used in this subsection, "entity"
means a corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, or limited liability company. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §23; RL 1945,
§7244; am L 1949, c 301, §1(c); am L 1951, c 223, §1(4); RL 1955, §159-41; am L
1957, c 321, §1(d); am L 1965, c 96, §97; am L 1967, c 119, §1; HRS §281-41; am
L 1969, c 207, §1; am L 1971, c 76, §1; am L 1972, c 96, §1; am L 1980, c 256,
§2; gen ch 1985; am L 1995, c 142, §1; am L 1998, c 90, §3; am L 2001, c 257, §4;
am L 2002, c 120, §2; am L 2006, c 44, §2; am L 2009, c 184, §7; am L 2016, c
12, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next